Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.22, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Risk of harm; set aside. (a) The commissionernew text begin or the chief judge of the Office of Administrative Hearings under section 245C.24, subdivision 2, paragraph (h),new text end may set aside the disqualification if the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end finds that the individual has submitted sufficient information to demonstrate that the individual does not pose a risk of harm to any person served by the applicant, license holder, or other entities as provided in this chapter. (b) In determining whether the individual has met the burden of proof by demonstrating the individual does not pose a risk of harm, the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end shall consider: (1) the nature, severity, and consequences of the event or events that led to the disqualification; (2) whether there is more than one disqualifying event; (3) the age and vulnerability of the victim at the time of the event; (4) the harm suffered by the victim; (5) vulnerability of persons served by the program; (6) the similarity between the victim and persons served by the program; (7) the time elapsed without a repeat of the same or similar event; (8) documentation of successful completion by the individual studied of training or rehabilitation pertinent to the event; and (9) any other information relevant to reconsideration. (c) For an individual seeking a child foster care license who is a relative of the child, the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end shall consider the importance of maintaining the child's relationship with relatives as an additional significant factor in determining whether a background study disqualification should be set aside. (d) If the individual requested reconsideration on the basis that the information relied upon to disqualify the individual was incorrect or inaccurate and the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end determines that the information relied upon to disqualify the individual is correct, the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end must also determine if the individual poses a risk of harm to persons receiving services in accordance with paragraph (b). (e) For an individual seeking employment in the substance use disorder treatment field, the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end shall set aside the disqualification if the following criteria are met: (1) the individual is not disqualified for a crime of violence as listed under section 624.712, subdivision 5, except for the following crimes: crimes listed under section 152.021, subdivision 2 or 2a; 152.022, subdivision 2; 152.023, subdivision 2; 152.024; or 152.025; (2) the individual is not disqualified under section 245C.15, subdivision 1new text begin , except as provided under section 245C.24, subdivision 2, paragraph (h)new text end ; (3) the individual is not disqualified under section 245C.15, subdivision 4, paragraph (b); (4) the individual provided documentation of successful completion of treatment, at least one year prior to the date of the request for reconsideration, at a program licensed under chapter 245G, and has had no disqualifying crimes or conduct under section 245C.15 after the successful completion of treatment; (5) the individual provided documentation demonstrating abstinence from controlled substances, as defined in section 152.01, subdivision 4, for the period of one year prior to the date of the request for reconsideration; and (6) the individual is seeking employment in the substance use disorder treatment field. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.22, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Scope of set-aside. (a) If the commissioner new text begin or chief judge of the Office of Administrative Hearings new text end sets aside a disqualification under this section, the disqualified individual remains disqualified, but may hold a license and have direct contact with or access to persons receiving services. Except as provided in paragraph (b), the commissioner's new text begin or chief judge's new text end set-aside of a disqualification is limited solely to the licensed program, applicant, or agency specified in the set aside notice under section 245C.23. For personal care provider organizations, the commissioner's new text begin or chief judge's new text end set-aside may further be limited to a specific individual who is receiving services. For new background studies required under section 245C.04, subdivision 1, paragraph (h), if an individual's disqualification was previously set aside for the license holder's program and the new background study results in no new information that indicates the individual may pose a risk of harm to persons receiving services from the license holder, the previous set-aside shall remain in effect. (b) If the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end has previously set aside an individual's disqualification for one or more programs or agencies, and the individual is the subject of a subsequent background study for a different program or agency, the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end shall determine whether the disqualification is set aside for the program or agency that initiated the subsequent background study. A notice of a set-aside under paragraph (c) shall be issued new text begin by the commissioner, or for set-asides permitted under section 245C.24, subdivision 2, paragraph (h), by the chief judge, new text end within 15 working days if all of the following criteria are met: (1) the subsequent background study was initiated in connection with a program licensed or regulated under the same provisions of law and rule for at least one program for which the individual's disqualification was previously set aside by the commissionernew text begin or chief judgenew text end ; (2) the individual is not disqualified for an offense specified in section 245C.15, subdivision 1 or 2new text begin , except as provided under section 245C.24, subdivision 2, paragraph (h)new text end ; (3) the commissioner has received no new information to indicate that the individual may pose a risk of harm to any person served by the program; and (4) the previous set-aside was not limited to a specific person receiving services. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), clause (2), for an individual who is employed in the substance use disorder field, if the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end has previously set aside an individual's disqualification for one or more programs or agencies in the substance use disorder treatment field, and the individual is the subject of a subsequent background study for a different program or agency in the substance use disorder treatment field, the commissioner new text begin or chief judge new text end shall set aside the disqualification for the program or agency in the substance use disorder treatment field that initiated the subsequent background study when the criteria under paragraph (b), clauses (1), (3), and (4), are met and the individual is not disqualified for an offense specified in section 245C.15, subdivision 1. A notice of a set-aside under paragraph (d) shall be issued within 15 working days. (d) When a disqualification is set aside under paragraph (b), the notice of background study results issued under section 245C.17, in addition to the requirements under section 245C.17, shall state that the disqualification is set aside for the program or agency that initiated the subsequent background study. The notice must inform the individual that the individual may request reconsideration of the disqualification under section 245C.21 on the basis that the information used to disqualify the individual is incorrect. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.24, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Permanent bar to set aside a disqualification. (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) to (g), the commissioner may not set aside the disqualification of any individual disqualified pursuant to this chapter, regardless of how much time has passed, if the individual was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed in section 245C.15, subdivision 1. (b) For an individual in the substance use disorder or corrections field who was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed under section 245C.15, subdivision 1, and whose disqualification was set aside prior to July 1, 2005, the commissioner must consider granting a variance pursuant to section 245C.30 for the license holder for a program dealing primarily with adults. A request for reconsideration evaluated under this paragraph must include a letter of recommendation from the license holder that was subject to the prior set-aside decision addressing the individual's quality of care to children or vulnerable adults and the circumstances of the individual's departure from that service. (c) If an individual who requires a background study for nonemergency medical transportation services under section 245C.03, subdivision 12, was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed under section 245C.15, subdivision 1, and if more than 40 years have passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed, the commissioner may consider granting a set-aside pursuant to section 245C.22. A request for reconsideration evaluated under this paragraph must include a letter of recommendation from the employer. This paragraph does not apply to a person disqualified based on a violation of sections 243.166; 609.185 to 609.205; 609.25; 609.342 to 609.3453; 609.352; 617.23, subdivision 2, clause (1), or 3, clause (1); 617.246; or 617.247. (d) When a licensed foster care provider adopts an individual who had received foster care services from the provider for over six months, and the adopted individual is required to receive a background study under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2) or (6), the commissioner may grant a variance to the license holder under section 245C.30 to permit the adopted individual with a permanent disqualification to remain affiliated with the license holder under the conditions of the variance when the variance is recommended by the county of responsibility for each of the remaining individuals in placement in the home and the licensing agency for the home. (e) For an individual 18 years of age or older affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, the commissioner must not set aside or grant a variance for the disqualification of any individual disqualified pursuant to this chapter, regardless of how much time has passed, if the individual was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed in section 245C.15, subdivision 4a, paragraphs (a) and (b). (f) In connection with a family foster setting license, the commissioner may grant a variance to the disqualification for an individual who is under 18 years of age at the time the background study is submitted. (g) In connection with foster residence settings and children's residential facilities, the commissioner must not set aside or grant a variance for the disqualification of any individual disqualified pursuant to this chapter, regardless of how much time has passed, if the individual was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed in section 245C.15, subdivision 4a, paragraph (a) or (b). new text begin (h) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (g), and except as provided in paragraph (i) or under federal law, the chief judge of the Office of Administrative Hearings may set aside the disqualification of any individual disqualified pursuant to this chapter for crimes or conduct listed in section 245C.15, subdivision 1, if the individual has no subsequent convictions and: new text end new text begin (1) the disqualifying crime is an arrest not followed by a conviction within five years or an arrest where charges were dropped; new text end new text begin (2) ten years have passed since the date of completion of the individual's sentence or release from incarceration; new text end new text begin (3) the individual's civil right to bear firearms has been restored in Minnesota; or new text end new text begin (4) the disqualifying crime has been pardoned or expunged. new text end new text begin (i) The chief judge must not set aside the disqualification of any individual disqualified pursuant to this chapter for a crime or conduct involving murder, manslaughter, or criminal sexual misconduct or for any crime against or involving children. new text end